California, session 20252026, SB1203.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Stand for Security: Security Industry Standards and Public Safety Act.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Security guards are increasingly relied upon by property managers, businesses, nonprofits, unincorporated associations, public entities, as well as stakeholders within those organizations, to professionally deescalate stressful and dangerous situations, secure property, and protect the interests of the organizations and individuals they serve.(b) Security guards are essential to the safety and security of organizations, individuals, and the public.(c) Security guards in California interact with individuals from the public with substance abuse, mental health, behavioral, and other challenging issues that elevate risks for guards and members of the public.(d) Current deescalation training requirements for security guards primarily rely on descriptive methods that do not require security guards to practice the deescalation tactics they are informed about.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that California security guards have a strong understanding of their rights as workers, as well as their constitutional rights, and the constitutional rights of security contractors’ clients.(f) It is further the intent of the Legislature to equip security guards with knowledge of their rights that they can also use to protect their families, neighbors, and communities at a time of potential disruption, dislocation, and fear for many Californians.(g) Higher wages are an important means of retaining an experienced workforce and attracting new workers. A stable workforce benefits the safety and security of individuals and organizations throughout California.(h) Security guards have traditionally included low-wage workers. Security employers compete with fast food employers and other historically low-wage employers to find workers willing to undergo the regulatory requirements, demands, stress, and personal risk of serving as security guards.(i) Employers across multiple industries are raising wages. The security services sector in California must offer higher wages to remain competitive while providing the services necessary for the public interest.SEC. 3.Section 7574.18 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.18.(a)Except for a person who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, each applicant for a proprietary private security officer registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition of issuance of the registration. Course providers authorized to provide training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of each training. A person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer shall complete 34 hours of training in security officer skills within six months from the date upon which registration is issued, or within six months of their employment with a proprietary private security employer. A proprietary private security officer registrant shall complete 18 of the 34 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued. Training on the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, and security officer skills training, shall meet the standards and requirements described in Sections 7583.6 and 7583.7.(b)(1)Except as provided in paragraph (2), a course provider shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer upon satisfactory completion of a required course, conducted in accordance with the department’s requirements.(2)If a proprietary private security employer administers a course of training pursuant to this section, that proprietary private security employer shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer for the completion of training in security officer skills that each proprietary private security officer is required to complete, as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. However, the employer shall not be required to provide a certificate for training courses provided pursuant to a curriculum adopted by the department that are specific to that employer’s business and where the subject of training is not specifically required by the department.(c)An employer of a proprietary private security officer may provide training programs and courses in addition to the training required in this section.(d)The department shall develop and establish by regulation a standard course and curriculum, which shall include a minimum number of hours of instruction, for the skills training required by subdivision (a) to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property. For this purpose, the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 7574.5, as added by Chapter 721 of the Statutes of 2007, are continued in existence, and shall be amended by the department as necessary.(e)The course of training required by subdivision (a) may be administered, tested, and certified by any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school approved by the department. The department may approve any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school to teach the course.(f)(1)A proprietary private security employer shall annually provide each employee registered pursuant to this chapter with specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed in the training required in this section. The bureau shall adopt and approve by regulation the minimum number of hours required for annual review.(2)A proprietary private security employer shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record verifying completion of the review or practice training for a period of not less than two years. The records shall be available for inspection by the department upon request.(3)In addition to any annual training required by regulation, each employee registered pursuant to this chapter shall annually complete a minimum of eight hours of training dedicated to practicing deescalation skills through in-person role-play and interactive training methods administered by an organization, or a person certified by an organization, that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies in their training. The training time shall be compensated by the employer.(g)This section does not apply to a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.(h)A person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer may submit Verification of Military Experience and Training (VMET) records that document that the person has completed equivalent military training in lieu of completing a course of training in security officer skills pursuant to subdivision (a). The department shall determine the type of equivalent military training that qualifies to serve as a substitute.(i)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.SEC. 4.Section 7574.30 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.30.(a)Pursuant to Section 125.9, the director may issue a citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, for a violation of this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.(b)Pursuant to Section 148, the director may issue an administrative citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, to an unregistered person who is acting as a proprietary private security officer without a valid registration or to a person who is acting as a proprietary private security employer without a valid registration.(c)The fine for violating subdivision (a), (b), or (e) of Section 7574.38 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.(d)The fine for violating subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 7574.38 shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(e)The fine for violating subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 7574.39 shall be five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.(f)The fine for violating subdivision (b) of Section 7574.39 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).(g)The fine for violating subdivisions (f) or (g) of Section 7574.38 shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.SEC. 5.Section 7574.38 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.38.A proprietary private security employer shall not do any of the following:(a)Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each proprietary private security officer, and the date of termination of employment when a proprietary private security officer is terminated as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7574.21.(b)Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each proprietary private security officer of the training required by Section 7574.18.(c)Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.(d)Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon, including any electronic control device, stun gun, baton, or any chemical agent, including pepper spray.(e)Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee the review or practice training required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 7574.18.(f)Fail to ensure that the security skills training occurs as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7574.18.(g)Fail to compensate employees for training as required by subdivisions (a) of Section 7574.18, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 7574.18.SEC. 6.Section 7583.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.2.A person licensed as a private patrol operator shall not do any of the following:(a)Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of all firearms or other deadly weapons that are in the possession of the licensee or of any employee while on duty. Within seven days after a licensee or the licensee’s employees discover that a deadly weapon that has been recorded as being in the licensee’s possession has been misplaced, lost, or stolen, or is in any other way missing, the licensee or their manager shall mail or deliver to any local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction, a written report concerning the incident. The report shall describe fully the circumstances surrounding the incident, any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a police investigation was conducted.(b)Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each employee, and the date of termination of employment when an employee is terminated.(c)Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each employee of the licensee of the trainings and for the retention period specified in Section 7583.6.(d)Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.(e)Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon without first ascertaining that the employee is proficient in the use of each weapon to be carried. With respect to firearms, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a firearm training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that specified caliber of firearm and a current and valid firearm qualification permit issued by the department. With respect to other deadly weapons, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that particular deadly weapon.(f)(1)Fail to deliver to the director a written report describing the circumstances surrounding the discharge of any firearm, or physical altercation with a member of the public while on duty, by a licensee or any officer, partner, or employee of a licensee while acting within the course and scope of their employment within seven business days after the qualifying incident.(2)The report shall be required only for physical altercations that result in any of the following:(A)The arrest of a security guard.(B)The filing of a police report by a member of the public.(C)A member of the public requiring any type of first aid or other medical attention.(D)The discharge, suspension, or reprimand of a security guard by their employer.(E)Any physical use of force or violence on any person while on duty.(F)A security officer requiring first aid or other medical attention.(3)The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, apparent race and gender of the member of the public, whether the security officer involved had received all required training at the time of the incident, and whether a police investigation was conducted. Any report may be investigated by the director to determine if any disciplinary action is necessary.(4)A report shall not be required when a security officer or multiple security officers are requested by hospital staff to assist in restraining a patient by either holding the patient or limiting the movement of the patient for medical or mental health reasons.(5)The bureau shall release a report annually containing data, per county, with respect to the reports required pursuant to this subdivision, as follows:(A)Total number of reports.(B)Total number of reports involving the discharge of a firearm, including reports based upon apparent race and gender of the member of the public.(C)Total number of reports involving other physical use of force or violence on a person, including reports based on apparent race and gender of the member of the public.(D)Total number of reports in which a member of the public required first aid or other medical attention.(E)Total number of reports in which a security officer required first aid or other medical attention.(F)Total number of reports in which a security officer lacked all required training at the time of the incident.(G)A comparison of the current year’s data with data from the previous two years.(g)Fail to notify the bureau in writing and within 30 days that a manager previously qualified pursuant to this chapter is no longer connected with the licensee.(h)Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee, the review or practice training required by subdivision (e) of Section 7583.6.(i)Fail to ensure that the security skills training occurs as required by subdivision (b) of Section 7583.6, or paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 7583.6 occurs.(j)Fail to compensate employees for training as required by subdivisions (b) and (e) of Section 7583.6, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.7.SEC. 7.Section 7583.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.5.(a)Every licensee and any person employed and compensated by a licensee, other lawful business, or public agency as a security guard or patrolperson, and who in the course of that employment or business carries a firearm, shall complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force and a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms. This subdivision shall not apply to armored vehicle guards hired prior to January 1, 1977. Armored vehicle guards hired on or after January 1, 1977, shall complete a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms, but shall not be required to complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The course of training in the carrying and use of firearms shall not be required of any employee who is not required or permitted by a licensee to carry or use firearms. The course in the carrying and use of firearms and the course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force shall meet the standards which shall be prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs. The department shall encourage restraint and caution in the use of firearms.(b)No licensee or uniformed employee of a licensee shall carry or use any firearm unless the licensee or employee has in their possession a valid firearms qualification card.(c)In addition to any other required training, the department shall develop and establish by regulation a standard course and curriculum that shall include a minimum number of hours of instruction for training individuals on the role of implicit and explicit bias on racial profiling and the use of firearms in commercial, entertainment, government property, urban street, and residential settings.SEC. 8.Section 7583.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.6.(a)Each applicant for a security guard registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition for the issuance of the registration. A course provider authorized to provide the training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of the training. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with Section 7583.7 and any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau. The training shall be administered and certified by a single course provider, pursuant to subdivision (f), and shall be completed within six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau. Notwithstanding the requirements of this subdivision, the deescalation training required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.7 may be provided by a separate provider as provided in that section.(b)(1)Except for a registrant who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a security guard registrant shall complete not less than 34 hours of training in security guard skills within six months from the date an initial registration is issued. A security guard registrant shall complete 18 of the 34 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued. The 34 hours of training shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.7. No part of this training shall be completed while a guard is on duty at their post. The time spent to attend the training shall be compensated by the licensee if the guard is employed by, or has a pending offer of employment from, the licensee. The cost of the training shall be provided by the employer of the guard.(2)Two of the first 18 hours of the 34 hours of training, which are required to be completed within 30 days from the date the registration is issued, shall be dedicated to training employees on the rights contained in the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 1553 of the Labor Code.(c)A course provider, which is authorized to provide the training required by subdivision (b) pursuant to subdivision (f), shall issue a certificate of completion to a registrant after the registrant completes each training course. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau subject to this chapter.(d)(1)A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (a) shall complete the training within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(2)A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (b) shall complete 16 hours of the training within 30 days of the registrant’s employment date and shall complete the 16 remaining hours within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(e)A registrant shall annually complete 16 hours of specifically dedicated review or practice of security guard skills prescribed in this section, Section 7583.7, or by the bureau by regulation. At least eight of these hours must be dedicated to practicing deescalation skills through in-person role-play and interactive training methods administered by an organization, or a person certified by an organization, that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies in their training. This annual training shall be compensated by any employer for whom the guard works, or from whom the guard has a pending offer of employment.(f)The trainings specified in this section, except for the evidence-based, trauma-informed deescalation skills training, may be administered, tested, and certified by one of the following:(1)Any licensee, provided that the licensee shall provide the training only to their applicants for employment and direct employees.(2)Any training facility certified pursuant to this chapter.(3)Any organization or school approved by the bureau. The bureau shall approve any instructor of an organization or school who will administer the trainings specified in this section to ensure that the organization or school complies with the requirements of this chapter, as well as any applicable regulations.(4)Upon request, a labor organization that represents security guards of a licensee and is approved by the bureau as provided in this paragraph shall be entitled to provide the two-hour training on rights contained in the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 1553 of the Labor Code to the licensee’s security guards. Absent such request, this two-hour training may be provided by the entities listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive. The bureau shall approve a labor organization to be a provider of this two-hour training within 30 days of a labor organization’s written request to the bureau to be approved as a trainer if the request identifies the names of the trainers to provide the training and certifies that the trainers are qualified to train on the rights contained in the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 1553 of the Labor Code.(g)(1)A registrant shall maintain the certificate of completion the registrant received for each training course prescribed in this section until the registration expires or has been canceled. The registrant shall provide the records to the bureau upon request.(2)A licensee shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record for each of its registrant employees verifying completion of the trainings required by this section for the duration of the registrant’s employment. The records shall be available for inspection by the bureau upon request.(h)This section does not apply to a peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(i)This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.(j)(1)The bureau shall develop and approve by regulation a standard course and curriculum for the skills trainings required by this section to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property.(2)The bureau shall develop an outline for the course and curriculum described in paragraph (1) in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.SEC. 3. Section 7574.18 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.18. (a) Except for a person who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer shall complete training in security officer skills within six months from the date upon which registration is issued, or within six months of their employment with a proprietary private security employer.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a course provider shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer upon satisfactory completion of a required course, conducted in accordance with the department’s requirements.(2) If a proprietary private security employer administers a course of training pursuant to this section, that proprietary private security employer shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer for the completion of training in security officer skills that each proprietary private security officer is required to complete, as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. However, the employer shall not be required to provide a certificate for training courses provided pursuant to a curriculum adopted by the department that are specific to that employer’s business and where the subject of training is not specifically required by the department.(c) An employer of a proprietary private security officer may provide training programs and courses in addition to the training required in this section.(d) The department shall develop and establish by regulation a standard course and curriculum, which shall include a minimum number of hours of instruction, for the skills training required by subdivision (a) to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property. For this purpose, the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 7574.5, as added by Chapter 721 of the Statutes of 2007, are continued in existence, and shall be amended by the department as necessary.(e) The course of training required by subdivision (a) may be administered, tested, and certified by any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school approved by the department. The department may approve any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school to teach the course.(f) (1) A proprietary private security employer shall annually provide each employee registered pursuant to this chapter with specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed in the training required in this section. The bureau shall adopt and approve by regulation the minimum number of hours required for annual review.(2) A proprietary private security employer shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record verifying completion of the review or practice training for a period of not less than two years. The records shall be available for inspection by the department upon request.(g) This section does not apply to a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.(h) A person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer may submit Verification of Military Experience and Training (VMET) records that document that the person has completed equivalent military training in lieu of completing a course of training in security officer skills pursuant to subdivision (a). The department shall determine the type of equivalent military training that qualifies to serve as a substitute.(i)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 7574.18 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7574.18. (a) Except for a person who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, each applicant for a proprietary private security officer registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition of issuance of the registration. Course providers authorized to provide training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of each training. A person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer shall complete 42 hours of training in security officer skills within six months from the date upon which registration is issued, or within six months of their employment with a proprietary private security employer. A proprietary private security officer registrant shall complete 18 of the 42 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued. Training on the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, and security officer skills training, shall meet the standards and requirements described in Sections 7583.6 and 7583.7. (b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a course provider shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer upon satisfactory completion of a required course, conducted in accordance with the department’s requirements. (2) If a proprietary private security employer administers a course of training pursuant to this section, that proprietary private security employer shall issue a certificate to a proprietary private security officer for the completion of training in security officer skills that each proprietary private security officer is required to complete, as determined by the department, including, but not limited to, training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. However, the employer shall not be required to provide a certificate for training courses provided pursuant to a curriculum adopted by the department that are specific to that employer’s business and where the subject of training is not specifically required by the department. (c) An employer of a proprietary private security officer may provide training programs and courses in addition to the training required in this section. (d) The department shall develop and establish by regulation a standard course and curriculum, which shall include a minimum number of hours of instruction, for the skills training required by subdivision (a) to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property. For this purpose, the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 7574.5, as added by Chapter 721 of the Statutes of 2007, are continued in existence, and shall be amended by the department as necessary. (e) The course of training required by subdivision (a) may be administered, tested, and certified by any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school approved by the department. The department may approve any proprietary private security employer, organization, or school to teach the course, except for the deescalation training prescribed by paragraphs (3) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.6. (f) (1) A proprietary private security employer shall annually provide each employee registered pursuant to this chapter with specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed in the training required in this section. The bureau shall adopt and approve by regulation the minimum number of hours required for annual review. (2) A proprietary private security employer shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record verifying completion of the review or practice training for a period of not less than two years. The records shall be available for inspection by the department upon request. (3) In addition to any annual training required by regulation, each employee registered pursuant to this chapter shall annually complete a minimum of eight hours of training dedicated to practicing deescalation skills through in-person role-plays and interactive training methods administered by an organization approved pursuant to paragraphs (4) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.6.(g) This section does not apply to a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards. (h)  A person registered and hired as a proprietary private security officer may submit Verification of Military Experience and Training (VMET) records that document that the person has completed equivalent military training in lieu of completing a course of training in security officer skills pursuant to subdivision (a). The department shall determine the type of equivalent military training that qualifies to serve as a substitute. (i) A church, mosque, shrine, synagogue, temple, or other place of worship:(1) Is exempt from requiring its proprietary private security officers to take the eight hours of initial deescalation training as a part of the security skills training and the annual deescalation trainings prescribed by subdivision (a) of this section and Section 7583.6.(2) Is exempt from requiring its proprietary private security officers to take the annual deescalation trainings prescribed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).(3) Shall only be required to ensure its proprietary private security officers take 16 hours of the security officer skills training prescribed in subdivision (a).(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 5. Section 7574.30 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.30. (a) Pursuant to Section 125.9, the director may issue a citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, for a violation of this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.(b) Pursuant to Section 148, the director may issue an administrative citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, to an unregistered person who is acting as a proprietary private security officer without a valid registration or to a person who is acting as a proprietary private security employer without a valid registration.(c) The fine for violating subdivision (a), (b), or (e) of Section 7574.38 shall be five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.(d) The fine for violating subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 7574.38 shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(e) The fine for violating subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 7574.39 shall be five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.(f) The fine for violating subdivision (b) of Section 7574.39 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).(g) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 7574.30 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7574.30. (a) Pursuant to Section 125.9, the director may issue a citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, for a violation of this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.(b) Pursuant to Section 148, the director may issue an administrative citation, which may include an order of abatement or an order to pay an administrative fine, to an unregistered person who is acting as a proprietary private security officer without a valid registration or to a person who is acting as a proprietary private security employer without a valid registration.(c) The fine for violating subdivision (a), (b), or (e) of Section 7574.38 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.(d) The fine for violating subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 7574.38 shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.(e) The fine for violating subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 7574.39 shall be five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.(f) The fine for violating subdivision (b) of Section 7574.39 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).(g) The fine for violating subdivisions (f) or (g) of Section 7574.38 shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. (h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 7. Section 7574.38 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7574.38. A proprietary private security employer shall not do any of the following:(a) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each proprietary private security officer, and the date of termination of employment when a proprietary private security officer is terminated as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7574.21.(b) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each proprietary private security officer of the trainings required by Section 7574.18.(c) Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.(d) Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon, including any electronic control device, stun gun, baton, or any chemical agent, including pepper spray.(e) Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee the review or practice training required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 7574.18.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 8. Section 7574.38 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7574.38. A proprietary private security employer shall not do any of the following:(a) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each proprietary private security officer, and the date of termination of employment when a proprietary private security officer is terminated as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7574.21.(b) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each proprietary private security officer of the training required by Section 7574.18.(c) Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.(d) Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon, including any electronic control device, stun gun, baton, or any chemical agent, including pepper spray.(e) Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee the review or practice training required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 7574.18.(f) Fail to ensure that the security skills training occurs as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7574.18.(g) Fail to compensate employees for training as required by subdivisions (a) of Section 7574.18, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 7574.18. (h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 9. Section 7581.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7581.2. (a) Each disciplinary review committee shall perform the following functions as they pertain to private patrol operators, security guards, firearm qualification cardholders, baton permitholders, firearm training facilities, firearm training instructors, baton training facilities, and baton training instructors, as licensed, permitted, certified, or registered by the bureau under this chapter, and proprietary security officers, as registered by the bureau under Chapter 11.4 (commencing with Section 7574):(1) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions that concern administrative fines assessed by the director.(2) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions that concern denials, revocations, or suspensions of a license, certificate, or registration except denials, revocations, or suspensions ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(b)This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 10. Section 7581.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7581.2. (a) Each disciplinary review committee shall perform the following functions as they pertain to private patrol operators, security guards, firearm qualification cardholders, baton permitholders, firearm training facilities, firearm training instructors, baton training facilities, baton training instructors, and deescalation organizations, as licensed, permitted, certified, or registered by the bureau under this chapter, and proprietary security officers, as registered by the bureau under Chapter 11.4 (commencing with Section 7574):(1) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions that concern administrative fines assessed by the director.(2) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions that concern denials, revocations, or suspensions of a license, certificate, or registration except denials, revocations, or suspensions ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028. SEC. 11. Section 7581.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7581.3. (a) A private patrol operator, qualified manager of a private patrol operator, security guard, firearm qualification cardholder, baton permitholder, firearm training facility, firearm training instructor, baton training facility, or baton training instructor may request a review by a disciplinary review committee to contest the assessment of an administrative fine or to appeal a denial, revocation, or suspension of a license, certificate, or registration unless the denial, revocation, or suspension is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(b) A request for a review shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the issuance of the citation and assessment, denial, revocation, or suspension.(c) Following a review by a disciplinary review committee, the appellant shall be notified within 30 days, in writing, by regular mail, of the committee’s decision.(d) If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by a disciplinary review committee, they may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A request for a hearing following a decision by a disciplinary review committee shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days following notice of the committee’s decision.(e) If the appellant does not request a hearing within 30 days, the review committee’s decision shall become final.(f)This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 12. Section 7581.3 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7581.3. (a) A private patrol operator, qualified manager of a private patrol operator, security guard, firearm qualification cardholder, baton permitholder, firearm training facility, firearm training instructor, baton training facility, baton training instructor, or deescalation organization may request a review by a disciplinary review committee to contest the assessment of an administrative fine or to appeal a denial, revocation, or suspension of a license, certificate, or registration unless the denial, revocation, or suspension is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(b) A request for a review shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the issuance of the citation and assessment, denial, revocation, or suspension.(c) Following a review by a disciplinary review committee, the appellant shall be notified within 30 days, in writing, by regular mail, of the committee’s decision.(d) If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by a disciplinary review committee, they may request a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. A request for a hearing following a decision by a disciplinary review committee shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days following notice of the committee’s decision.(e) If the appellant does not request a hearing within 30 days, the review committee’s decision shall become final.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028. SEC. 13. Section 7583.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.2. A person licensed as a private patrol operator shall not do any of the following:(a) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of all firearms or other deadly weapons that are in the possession of the licensee or of any employee while on duty. Within seven days after a licensee or the licensee’s employees discover that a deadly weapon that has been recorded as being in the licensee’s possession has been misplaced, lost, or stolen, or is in any other way missing, the licensee or their manager shall mail or deliver to any local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction, a written report concerning the incident. The report shall describe fully the circumstances surrounding the incident, any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a police investigation was conducted.(b) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each employee, and the date of termination of employment when an employee is terminated.(c) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each employee of the licensee of the trainings and for the retention period specified in Section 7583.6.(d) Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.(e) Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon without first ascertaining that the employee is proficient in the use of each weapon to be carried. With respect to firearms, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a firearm training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that specified caliber of firearm and a current and valid firearm qualification permit issued by the department. With respect to other deadly weapons, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that particular deadly weapon.(f) (1) Fail to deliver to the director a written report describing the circumstances surrounding the discharge of any firearm, or physical altercation with a member of the public while on duty, by a licensee or any officer, partner, or employee of a licensee while acting within the course and scope of their employment within seven business days after the qualifying incident.(2) The report shall be required only for physical altercations that result in any of the following:(A) The arrest of a security guard.(B) The filing of a police report by a member of the public.(C) A member of the public requiring any type of first aid or other medical attention.(D) The discharge, suspension, or reprimand of a security guard by their employer.(E) Any physical use of force or violence on any person while on duty.(3) The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a police investigation was conducted. Any report may be investigated by the director to determine if any disciplinary action is necessary.(4) A report shall not be required when a security officer or multiple security officers are requested by hospital staff to assist in restraining a patient by either holding the patient or limiting the movement of the patient for medical or mental health reasons.(g) Fail to notify the bureau in writing and within 30 days that a manager previously qualified pursuant to this chapter is no longer connected with the licensee.(h) Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee, licensee the review or practice training required by subdivision (e) of Section 7583.6.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 14. Section 7583.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7583.2. A person licensed as a private patrol operator shall not do any of the following:(a) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of all firearms or other deadly weapons that are in the possession of the licensee or of any employee while on duty. Within seven days after a licensee or the licensee’s employees discover that a deadly weapon that has been recorded as being in the licensee’s possession has been misplaced, lost, or stolen, or is in any other way missing, the licensee or their manager shall mail or deliver to any local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction, a written report concerning the incident. The report shall describe fully the circumstances surrounding the incident, any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a police investigation was conducted.(b) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each employee, and the date of termination of employment when an employee is terminated.(c) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each employee of the licensee of the trainings and for the retention period specified in Section 7583.6.(d) Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.(e) Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon without first ascertaining that the employee is proficient in the use of each weapon to be carried. With respect to firearms, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a firearm training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that specified caliber of firearm and a current and valid firearm qualification permit issued by the department. With respect to other deadly weapons, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that particular deadly weapon.(f) (1) Fail to deliver to the director a written report describing the circumstances surrounding the discharge of any firearm, or physical altercation with a member of the public while on duty, by a licensee or any officer, partner, or employee of a licensee while acting within the course and scope of their employment within seven business days after the qualifying incident.(2) The report shall be required only for physical altercations that result in any of the following:(A) The arrest of a security guard.(B) The filing of a police report by a member of the public.(C) A member of the public requiring any type of first aid or other medical attention.(D) The discharge, suspension, or reprimand of a security guard by their employer.(E) Any physical use of force or violence on any person while on duty.(F) A security officer requiring first aid or other medical attention.(3) The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, apparent race and gender of the member of the public, whether the security officer involved had received all required training at the time of the incident, and whether a police investigation was conducted. Any report may be investigated by the director to determine if any disciplinary action is necessary.(4) A report shall not be required when a security officer or multiple security officers are requested by hospital staff to assist in restraining a patient by either holding the patient or limiting the movement of the patient for medical or mental health reasons.(5) The bureau shall release a report annually containing data, per county, with respect to the reports required pursuant to this subdivision, as follows:(A) Total number of reports.(B) Total number of reports involving the discharge of a firearm, including reports based upon apparent race and gender of the member of the public.(C) Total number of reports involving other physical use of force or violence on a person, including reports based on apparent race and gender of the member of the public.(D) Total number of reports in which a member of the public required first aid or other medical attention.(E) Total number of reports in which a security officer required first aid or other medical attention.(F) Total number of reports in which a security officer lacked all required training at the time of the incident.(G) A comparison of the current year’s data with data from the previous two years.(g) Fail to notify the bureau in writing and within 30 days that a manager previously qualified pursuant to this chapter is no longer connected with the licensee.(h) Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee the review or practice training required by subdivision (e) of Section 7583.6.(i) Fail to ensure that the security skills training occurs as required by subdivision (b) of Section 7583.6, or paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 7583.6 occurs.(j) Fail to compensate employees for training as required by subdivisions (b) and (e) of Section 7583.6, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.7. (k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 15. Section 7583.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.5. (a) Every licensee and any person employed and compensated by a licensee, other lawful business, or public agency as a security guard or patrolperson, and who in the course of that employment or business carries a firearm, shall complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force and a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms. This subdivision shall not apply to armored vehicle guards hired prior to January 1, 1977. Armored vehicle guards hired on or after January 1, 1977, shall complete a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms, but shall not be required to complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The course of training in the carrying and use of firearms shall not be required of any employee who is not required or permitted by a licensee to carry or use firearms. The course in the carrying and use of firearms and the course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force shall meet the standards which shall be prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs. The department shall encourage restraint and caution in the use of firearms.(b) No licensee or uniformed employee of a licensee shall carry or use any firearm unless the licensee or employee has in their possession a valid firearms qualification card.(c)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 16. Section 7583.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7583.5. (a) Every licensee and any person employed and compensated by a licensee, other lawful business, or public agency as a security guard or patrolperson, and who in the course of that employment or business carries a firearm, shall complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force and a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms. This subdivision shall not apply to armored vehicle guards hired prior to January 1, 1977. Armored vehicle guards hired on or after January 1, 1977, shall complete a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms, but shall not be required to complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The course of training in the carrying and use of firearms shall not be required of any employee who is not required or permitted by a licensee to carry or use firearms. The course in the carrying and use of firearms and the course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force shall meet the standards which shall be prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs. The department shall encourage restraint and caution in the use of firearms.(b) No licensee or uniformed employee of a licensee shall carry or use any firearm unless the licensee or employee has in their possession a valid firearms qualification card.(c) In addition to any other required training, the department shall develop and establish by emergency regulation a standard course and curriculum that shall include a minimum number of hours of instruction for training individuals on the role of implicit and explicit bias on racial profiling and the use of firearms in commercial, entertainment, government property, urban street, and residential settings. The emergency regulation shall be adopted in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 17. Section 7583.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.6. (a) Each applicant for a security guard registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition for the issuance of the registration. A course provider authorized to provide the training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of the training. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with Section 7583.7 and any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau. The training shall be administered and certified by a single course provider, pursuant to subdivision (f), and shall be completed within six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau.(b) Except for a registrant who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a security guard registrant shall complete not less than 32 hours of training in security officer skills within six months from the date an initial registration is issued. A security guard registrant shall complete 16 of the 32 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued.(c) A course provider, which is authorized to provide the training required by subdivision (b) pursuant to subdivision (f), shall issue a certificate of completion to a registrant after the registrant completes each training course. The course provider shall conduct the trainings in accordance with any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau subject to this chapter.(d) (1) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (a) shall complete the training within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(2) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (b) shall complete 16 hours of the training within 30 days of the registrant’s employment date and shall complete the 16 remaining hours within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(e) A registrant shall annually complete eight hours of specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed in this section, Section 7583.7, or by the bureau by regulation.(f) The trainings specified in this section may be administered, tested, and certified by one of the following:(1) Any licensee, provided that the licensee shall provide the training only to their applicants for employment and direct employees.(2) Any training facility certified pursuant to this chapter.(3) Any organization or school approved by the bureau. The bureau shall approve any instructor of an organization or school who will administer the trainings specified in this section to ensure that the organization or school complies with the requirements of this chapter, as well as any applicable regulations.(g) (1) A registrant shall maintain the certificate of completion the registrant received for each training course prescribed in this section until the registration expires or has been canceled. The registrant shall provide the records to the bureau upon request.(2) A licensee shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record for each of its registrant employees verifying completion of the trainings required by this section for the duration of the registrant’s employment. The records shall be available for inspection by the bureau upon request.(h) This section does not apply to a peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(i) This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.(j) (1) The bureau shall develop and approve by regulation a standard course and curriculum for the skills trainings required by this section to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property.(2) The bureau shall develop an outline for the course and curriculum described in paragraph (1) in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 18. Section 7583.6 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7583.6. (a) Each applicant for a security guard registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition for the issuance of the registration. A course provider authorized to provide the training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of the training. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with Section 7583.7 and any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau. The training shall be administered and certified by a single course provider, pursuant to subdivision (f), and shall be completed within six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau. Notwithstanding the requirements of this subdivision, the deescalation training required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.7 may be provided by a separate provider as provided in that section.(b) (1) Except for a registrant who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a security guard registrant shall complete not less than 42 hours of training in security guard skills within six months from the date an initial registration is issued. A security guard registrant shall complete 18 of the 42 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued. The 42 hours of training shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.7. The eight hours of deescalation training prescribed by paragraph (3) shall be conducted by an instructor who is a human being and physically present, in person, and live with students in a classroom 100 percent of the course and available at all times to answer students’ questions while providing the required training. No part of this training shall be completed while a guard is on duty at their post. The time spent to attend the training shall be compensated by the licensee if the guard is employed by, or has a pending offer of employment from, the licensee. The cost of the training shall be provided by the employer of the guard.(2) Two of the first 18 hours of the 42 hours of training, which are required to be completed within 30 days from the date the registration is issued, shall be dedicated to training employees on the rights contained in the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 1553 of the Labor Code.(3) Eight hours of the 42 hours of security skills training shall be dedicated to practicing deescalation skills through in-person role-play and interactive training methods administered by an organization, or a person certified by an organization, that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies in their training. The portions of the deescalation training shall be no less than eight hours in duration. These eight hours of deescalation training shall be compensated by the employer if the individual is employed by, or has a pending offer of employment with, the employer. The cost of the deescalation training shall be paid for by the employer of an individual who takes the course if they are employed by, or have a pending offer of employment with, the employer.(4) For the purpose of this chapter, an organization that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies shall be an organization that provides specialized deescalation training that is based on principles and methods informed by peer-reviewed or clinical research on trauma and includes role-playing and interactive methods. The bureau shall develop emergency regulations establishing the criteria the bureau shall use to evaluate whether any organization is a qualifying organization. Organizations qualified to provide this training shall be identified by July 1, 2028. An organization shall be ineligible to provide the training prescribed herein if the organization is a licensee, a subsidiary of a licensee, or is a subsidiary of an organization that shares the same parent organization as a licensee. The emergency regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.(5) A person certified by an organization that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies shall be a natural person. A person shall not provide this training if they are employed by a licensee, a subsidiary of a licensee, or a subsidiary of an organization that shares the same parent organization as a licensee.(6) The organization, or person certified by an organization, that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies shall issue a certificate of completion to the trainee and their employer, if any, upon satisfactory completion of this training.(7) An organization wishing approval of the bureau to offer the deescalation training prescribed by this section shall complete an application for certification as a deescalation training organization. This application shall be accompanied by a two-hundred-fifty-dollar ($250) application fee, be in a form prescribed by the chief, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(A) The name, business address, and telephone number of the organization. (B) A detailed description of the places, days, and times the course will be offered.(C) An estimate of the minimum and maximum class size.(D) Location and description of the facilities.(E) The name or names of the instructors who will teach the course, each instructor’s months or years of experience providing deescalation training, and each instructor’s months or years of experience providing in-person deescalation training.(F) A certification that the applying organization will conduct the training as required by this section, any applicable regulations, and the standard course and curriculum developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (j).(8) Upon approval by the bureau, the chief shall issue to the facility a “deescalation organization certificate.” The certificate shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the facility.(9) The chief may refuse to issue or may cancel a previously issued deescalation organization certificate or may assess fines pursuant to Section 7587.7 on the grounds that the organization or a person certified by that organization failed to conduct the trainings as required by this section, any applicable regulations, and the standard course and curriculum developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (j).(c) A course provider, which is authorized to provide the training required by subdivision (b) pursuant to subdivision (f), other than the deescalation training required by paragraphs (3) to (9) of subdivision (b), shall issue a certificate of completion to a registrant after the registrant completes each training course. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau subject to this chapter.(d) (1) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (a) shall complete the training within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(2) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (b) shall complete 18 hours of the training within 30 days of the registrant’s employment date and shall complete the 24 remaining hours within six months of the registrant’s employment date.(e) A registrant shall annually complete 16 hours of specifically dedicated review or practice of security guard skills prescribed in this section, Section 7583.7, or by the bureau by regulation. At least eight of these hours must be dedicated to practicing deescalation skills through in-person role-play and interactive training methods administered by an organization, or a person certified by an organization, approved pursuant to paragraphs (4) to (9) of subdivision (b). This annual training shall be compensated by any employer for whom the guard works, or from whom the guard has a pending offer of employment.(f) The trainings specified in this section, except for the evidence-based, trauma-informed deescalation skills trainings, may be administered, tested, and certified by one of the following:(1) Any licensee, provided that the licensee shall provide the training only to their applicants for employment and direct employees.(2) Any training facility certified pursuant to this chapter.(3) Any organization or school approved by the bureau. The bureau shall approve any instructor of an organization or school who will administer the trainings specified in this section to ensure that the organization or school complies with the requirements of this chapter, as well as any applicable regulations.(4) Upon request, a labor organization that represents security guards of a licensee and is approved by the bureau as provided in this paragraph shall be entitled to provide the two-hour training on rights contained in the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 1553 of the Labor Code to the licensee’s security guards. Absent such request, this two-hour training may be provided by the entities listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive. The bureau shall approve a labor organization to be a provider of this two-hour training within 30 days of a labor organization’s written request to the bureau to be approved as a trainer if the request identifies the names of the trainers to provide the training and certifies that the trainers are qualified to train on the rights contained in the notice described in subdivision (a) of Section 1553 of the Labor Code.(g) (1) A registrant shall maintain the certificate of completion the registrant received for each training course prescribed in this section until the registration expires or has been canceled. The registrant shall provide the records to the bureau upon request.(2) A licensee shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record for each of its registrant employees verifying completion of the trainings required by this section for the duration of the registrant’s employment. The records shall be available for inspection by the bureau upon request.(h) This section does not apply to a peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(i) This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.(j) (1) The bureau shall develop and approve by regulation a standard course and curriculum for the skills trainings required by this section to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property.(2) The bureau shall develop an outline for the course and curriculum described in paragraph (1) in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. (3) The bureau shall develop and establish by emergency regulation a standard course and curriculum for the deescalation training prescribed by paragraphs (3) to (9) of subdivision (b). The emergency regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.SEC. 9.SEC. 19. Section 7583.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7583.7. (a) The course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force may be administered, tested, and certified by any licensee or by any organization or school approved by the department. The department may approve any person or school to teach the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The department may review and provide more guidance on courses of training when best practices are updated. The course of training shall be approximately eight hours in length and shall cover all of the following topics:(1) Responsibilities and ethics in citizen arrest.(2) Relationship between a security guard and a peace officer in making an arrest.(3) Limitations on security guard power to arrest.(4) Restrictions on searches and seizures.(5) Criminal and civil liabilities, including both of the following:(A) Personal liability.(B) Employer liability.(6) Trespass law.(7) Ethics and communications.(8) Emergency situation response, including response to medical emergencies.(9) Security officer safety.(10) The appropriate use of force, including all of the following topics:(A) Legal standards for use of force.(B) Duty to intercede.(C) The use of objectively reasonable force.(D) Supervisory responsibilities.(E) Use of force review and analysis.(F) Deescalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.(G) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.(H) Skills, including deescalation techniques, to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.(I) Use of force scenario training, including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.(J) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.(K) Active shooter situations.(11) Any other topic deemed appropriate by the bureau, excluding Weapons of Mass Destruction and Terrorism Awareness, which may be an elective topic only.(b) (1) The majority of the course shall be taught by means of verbal instruction. This instruction may include the use of a video presentation.(2) Paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction. For the purposes of this paragraph, “traditional classroom instruction” means instruction where the instructor is physically present with students in a classroom for a minimum of 50 percent of the course and is available at all times, including during instruction provided through distance learning or remote platforms, to answer students’ questions while providing the required training. In this setting, the instructor provides demonstrations and hands-on instruction in order to establish each student’s proficiency as to the course content.(c) (1) The department shall make available a guidebook as a standard for teaching the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, which may be known as the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual. The department shall encourage additional training and may provide a training guide recommending additional courses to be taken by security personnel.(2) The development, adoption, amendment, or repeal of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual by the bureau is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(d) Private patrol operators may provide a copy of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual to each person that they currently employ as a security guard. The private patrol operator may provide the guidebook to each person the private patrol operator intends to hire as a security guard a reasonable time prior to the time the person begins the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(e) The bureau may inspect, supervise, or view the administration of the test at any time and without any prior notification. Any impropriety in the administration of the course or the test shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 10.SEC. 20. Section 7583.7 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7583.7. (a) The course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force may be administered, tested, and certified by any organization that is not a licensee, or it may be administered, tested, and certified by a licensee or by any organization or school approved by the department. The department may approve any person who is not a licensee or a school to teach the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. However, a licensee may provide the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force training if expressly agreed to in a valid collective bargaining agreement that expressly refers to this section, provides for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees, final and binding arbitration of disputes concerning any training provisions, premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked, and regular hourly rate of pay of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage rate. The department may review and provide more guidance on courses of training when best practices are updated. The course of training shall be approximately 16 eight hours in length, including the deescalation training required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), length and shall cover all of the following topics:(1) Responsibilities and ethics in citizen arrest.(2) Relationship between a security guard and a peace officer in making an arrest.(3) Limitations on security guard power to arrest.(4) Restrictions on searches and seizures.(5) Criminal and civil liabilities, including both of the following:(A) Personal liability.(B) Employer liability.(6) Trespass law.(7) Ethics and communications.(8) Emergency situation response, including response to medical emergencies.(9) Security officer safety.(10) The appropriate use of force, including all of the following topics:(A) Legal standards for use of force.(B) Duty to intercede.(C) The use of objectively reasonable force.(D) Supervisory responsibilities.(E) Use of force review and analysis.(F) Deescalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid escalating situations that lead to violence.(G) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.(H) Skills, including deescalation techniques, to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.(I) Use of force scenario training, including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.(J) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.(K) Active shooter situations.(11) Any other topic deemed appropriate by the bureau, excluding Weapons of Mass Destruction and Terrorism Awareness, which may be an elective topic only.(b) (1) The majority of the course shall be taught by means of verbal instruction. This instruction may include the use of a video presentation.(2) Paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction. For the purposes of this article, “traditional classroom instruction” means instruction where the instructor is physically present, in-person, and live present with students in a classroom for 100 a minimum of 50 percent of the course and is available at all times times, including during instruction provided through distance learning or remote platforms, to answer students’ questions while providing the required training. In this setting, the instructor, who shall be a human being, instructor provides demonstrations and hands-on instruction in order to establish each student’s proficiency as to the course content.(3)Subparagraphs (F), (H), and (J) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be dedicated to security guards practicing deescalation skills through in-person role-play and interactive training methods administered by an organization, or a person certified by an organization, that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies in their training. An organization qualified to provide deescalation training shall be determined by the bureau. The portions of the deescalation training shall be no less than eight hours in duration. These eight hours of deescalation training shall not be considered when determining whether the power to arrest and use of force training as a whole meets the requirement of subdivision (b). These eight hours of deescalation training shall be compensated by the employer if the individual is employed by, or has a pending offer of employment with, the employer. The cost of the deescalation training shall be paid for by the employer of an individual who takes the course if they are employed by, or have a pending offer of employment with, the employer.(4)For the purpose of this chapter, an organization that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies shall be an organization whose mission or purpose is to provide specialized deescalation training that is based on principles and methods informed by peer-reviewed or clinical research on trauma and includes role-playing and interactive methods. The bureau shall develop emergency regulations establishing the criteria the bureau shall use to evaluate whether any organization is a qualifying organization. Organizations qualified to provide this training shall be identified by January 1, 2028. An organization shall be ineligible to provide the training prescribed herein if the organization is a licensee, a subsidiary of a licensee, or is a subsidiary of an organization that shares the same parent organization as a licensee. The emergency regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.(5)A person certified by an organization that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies shall be a natural person. A person may not provide this training if they are employed by a licensee, a subsidiary of a licensee, or a subsidiary of an organization that shares the same parent organization as a licensee. Notwithstanding the prohibition in this paragraph, an employer of a licensee may provide this training if expressly agreed to in a valid collective bargaining agreement, as provided in subdivision (a).(6)The organization, or person certified by an organization, that employs evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies shall issue a certificate of completion to the trainee and their employer, if any, upon satisfactory completion of the training.(c) (1) The department shall make available a guidebook as a standard for teaching the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force that may be known as the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual. The department shall encourage additional training and may provide a training guide recommending additional courses to be taken by security personnel. The department shall amend the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual to include material on deescalation skills and techniques utilized by bureau-approved organizations that employ evidence-based, trauma-informed techniques and strategies and shall consult with such organizations in this amendment and when otherwise developing, adopting, amending, or repealing the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual.(2) The development, adoption, amendment, or repeal of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual by the bureau is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(d) Private patrol operators may provide a copy of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual to each person that they currently employ as a security guard. The private patrol operator may provide the guidebook to each person the private patrol operator intends to hire as a security guard a reasonable time before the person begins the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.(e) The bureau may inspect, supervise, or view the administration of the test at any time and without any prior notification. Any impropriety in the administration of the course or the test shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.(f) This section shall become operative on January July 1, 2028.SEC. 11.SEC. 21. Section 7583.48 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7583.48. If the bureau or the department adopts, modifies, or seeks to rescind a rule or regulation pursuant to Section 7583.5, 7583.6, or 7583.7, or the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual required by Section 7583.7, the bureau shall convene a training advisory committee to recommend requirements and share their experience in the security industry. The training advisory committee shall be composed of representatives of the department and the bureau, and shall also include representatives from a recognized or certified collective bargaining agent that represents security workers, security employers, labor-management groups in the security industry, security officers, worker centers, and other related subject matter experts.SEC. 12.Section 7585.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7585.6.(a)All firearms course material provided to the certificate holder in the “Firearms Training Manual” issued by the bureau shall be covered in each class session. In no event shall the class instruction total less than 16 hours for the initial firearms qualification.The range instruction for the initial firearms qualification shall not exceed eight hours and shall cover the following subjects:(1)Range safety and procedure.(2)Demonstration and dry firing.(3)Practice rounds.(4)Qualification firing.(b)If a person fails to successfully complete the range instruction, that person may, at the discretion of the firearms training facility, continue range instruction for an additional eight hours. However, the person shall, in order to receive a firearms qualification card, be required to successfully pass the range instruction within 30 days of the passage of the classroom instruction.(c)Prior to range instruction a person shall participate in the classroom instruction and pass a bureau-developed examination of the subject matter with a minimum score of 85 percent. If a person fails to pass the written examination, they shall once more participate in the entire classroom instruction before retaking the examination. In no event shall a firearm instructor review the examination question by question with a person, allow a person to review the examination questions and answers, or in any manner assist a person with the examination.SEC. 13.SEC. 22. Section 7587.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7587.7. If, upon investigation, the director determines a licensee, including a corporation, or registrant is in violation of Section 7583.2, 7583.3, 7583.37, 7585.19, 7587.2, or 7587.14, the director may issue a citation to the licensee or registrant. The citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated. If the director deems it appropriate, the citation may contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation and may contain an assessment of an administrative fine. The amount of the fine shall in no event exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or as otherwise provided in this chapter, whichever is less.A citation or fine assessment shall inform the licensee or registrant that if they contest the finding of a violation, they may request a review by a disciplinary review committee in accordance with Section 7581.3. If a review is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. If a review is not allowed under this chapter, a licensee or registrant may request a hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if they wish to contest the findings of a violation, and if a hearing is not requested, payment of any fines shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged.If the licensee or registrant neither requests a review, nor pays the assessed fine within 30 days of the assessment, the license or registration of the person shall not be renewed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter until the assessed fine is paid.Administrative fines collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund, which fund is hereby created to carry out the purposes of this chapter.SEC. 14.SEC. 23. Section 1173.1 is added to the Labor Code, to read:1173.1. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the commission shall convene to perform the duties and functions required by Section 1173 solely for the property services industry.(b) In carrying out its duties and functions as required by this section, the commission shall convene regional hearings located in at least each of the following regions: Sacramento, San Francisco Bay area, Silicon Valley, Los Angeles, and San Diego.(c) For purposes of this section, the term “property services industry” shall mean the industry that consists of employers who hire personnel registered as proprietary private security officers pursuant to Chapter 11.4 (commencing with Section 7574) of, and security officers pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of, Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.(d) The commission shall issue a wage order specific to employees employed in the property services industry by June 30, 2028. After the issuance of the wage order required by this subdivision, the commission shall meet every two years, as required by Section 1173, to evaluate the adequacy of the minimum wage and to make any other determinations about hours and conditions of employment in the property services industry. In performing the requirements of this section, the commission shall not reduce the minimum wage or decrease worker protections with respect to hours and conditions of employment.SEC. 15.SEC. 24. The Legislature finds and declares that laws that establish, require, impose, limit, or otherwise relate to wages, salary, or compensation affect access to the provision of safe, consistent, and reliable security services to private and public entities, as well as to their employees, customers, and visitors. The Legislature further finds and declares that access to safe, consistent, and reliable security services for private and public entities is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section occupies the whole field of wages, salary, or compensation for covered security officers, and applies to all cities and counties, including charter cities, charter counties, and charter cities and counties.SEC. 16.SEC. 25. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 3.___________________